Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-13] Confirmation of receipt of
application and voted ballot. The chief election
officer, in coordination with local election officials, shall implement an
electronic free-access system by which a covered voter may determine by
telephone, electronic mail, or Internet whether:

(1) The voter's federal postcard application or other
registration or military-overseas ballot application has been received and
accepted; and

(2) The voter's military-overseas ballot has been
received. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next